apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="br/ing__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ings</l>                <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ought</l>               <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ought</l>               <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inging</l>              <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cost__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/uy__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>uy</l>                  <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uy</l>                  <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uys</l>                 <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ought</l>               <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ought</l>               <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>uying</l>               <r>uy<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ca/tch__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>tch</l>                 <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>tch</l>                 <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>tches</l>               <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ught</l>                <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ught</l>                <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>tching</l>              <r>tch<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="chid/e__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>e</l>                   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>es</l>                  <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>den</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l></l>                    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cho/ose__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ose</l>                 <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ose</l>                 <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oses</l>                <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>se</l>                  <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>sen</l>                 <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>osing</l>               <r>ose<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cl/ing__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ings</l>                <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ung</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ung</l>                 <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inging</l>              <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cl/othe__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>othe</l>                <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>othe</l>                <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>othes</l>               <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ad</l>                  <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ad</l>                  <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>othing</l>              <r>othe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="control__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>led</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>led</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ling</l>                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ke/ep__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ep</l>                  <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ep</l>                  <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eps</l>                 <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>pt</l>                  <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>pt</l>                  <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>eping</l>               <r>ep<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="deal__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>t</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="buy">                  <i>b</i><par n="b/uy__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bring">                <i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="burst">                <i>burst</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="catch">                <i>ca</i><par n="ca/tch__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cancel">               <i>cancel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cast">                 <i>cast</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="choose">               <i>cho</i><par n="cho/ose__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="control">              <i>control</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cost">                 <i>cost</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="counsel">              <i>counsel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deal">                 <i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deal with">            <i>deal</i><par n="deal__vblex"/><p><l><b/>with</l><r><g><b/>with</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="enrol">                <i>enrol</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="expel">                <i>expel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fulfil">               <i>fulfil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="keep on">              <i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="keep">                 <i>ke</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="label">                <i>label</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="learn">                <i>learn</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mean">                 <i>mean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="read">                 <i>read</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="signal">               <i>signal</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sleep">                <i>sle</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swing">                <i>sw</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sweep">                <i>swe</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="travel across">        <i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="travel">               <i>travel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="weep">                 <i>we</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cling">                <i>cl</i><par n="cl/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compel">               <i>compel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="creep">                <i>cre</i><par n="ke/ep__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dial">                 <i>dial</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dispel">               <i>dispel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distil">               <i>distil</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enamel">               <i>enamel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grovel">               <i>grovel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hurt">                 <i>hurt</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kneel">                <i>kneel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="level">                <i>level</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="marshal">              <i>marshal</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="propel">               <i>propel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pummel">               <i>pummel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="quarrel">              <i>quarrel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rebel">                <i>rebel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repel">                <i>repel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shrivel">              <i>shrivel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="thrust">               <i>thrust</i><par n="cost__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trial">                <i>trial</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tunnel">               <i>tunnel</i><par n="control__vblex"/></e>
<e>                           <i>lean</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
<e>                           <i>leap</i><par n="deal__vblex"/></e>
